Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.902

Effective date—Application—1988 c 288.

RCW 34.05.001 through 34.05.902 shall take effect on July 1, 1989, and shall apply to all rule-making actions and agency proceedings begun on or after that date. Rule-making actions or other agency proceedings begun before July 1, 1989, shall be completed under the applicable provisions of chapter 28B.19 or 34.04 RCW existing immediately before that date in the same manner as if they were not amended by chapter 288, Laws of 1988 or repealed by section 701 of chapter 288, Laws of 1988.

[ 1988 c 288 s 705.]

NOTES:

Recodification—Correction of statutory references—1988 c 288: "Parts X through XV of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 34 RCW, and the sections amended or set forth in this act shall be recodified in the order they appear in this act. The code reviser shall correct all statutory references to these sections and to the repealed chapters 28B.19 and 34.04 RCW to reflect this recodification and repeal." [ 1988 c 288 s 706.]